Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5514
Employee, defined.

Employee means a person employed at the project. An employee of a qualified employee leasing company shall be deemed to be an employee of the client-lessee if the employee performs services for the client-lessee. A qualified employee leasing company shall provide the Department of Revenue access to the records of employees leased to the client-lessee.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 14.